Illinois, session 104th, HB2368.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Estate and Generation-Skipping 5Transfer Tax Act is amended by changing Sections 2, 3, and 4 as 6follows: 7    (35 ILCS 405/2)  (from Ch. 120, par. 405A-2)8    Sec. 2. Definitions. 9    "Exemption amount" means, for persons dying on or after 10January 1, 2026 and for taxable transfers occurring on or 11after January 1, 2026, $4,000,000. 12    "Federal estate tax" means the tax due to the United 13States with respect to a taxable transfer under Chapter 11 of 14the Internal Revenue Code.15    "Federal generation-skipping transfer tax" means the tax 16due to the United States with respect to a taxable transfer 17under Chapter 13 of the Internal Revenue Code.18    "Federal return" means the federal estate tax return with 19respect to the federal estate tax and means the federal 20generation-skipping transfer tax return with respect to the 21federal generation-skipping transfer tax.22    "Federal transfer tax" means the federal estate tax or the 23federal generation-skipping transfer tax.  HB2368- 2 -LRB104 03009 HLH 13027 b1    "Illinois estate and generation-skipping transfer tax 2rate" means: 3        (1) in the case of the Illinois estate tax: 4            (A) if the decedent's Illinois taxable estate is 5        $6,000,000 or less, 5%; 6            (B) if the decedent's Illinois taxable estate 7        exceeds $6,000,000 but does not exceed $16,000,000, 8        10%; 9            (C) if the decedent's Illinois taxable estate 10        exceeds $16,000,000 but does not exceed $21,000,000, 11        16%; and 12            (D) if the decedent's Illinois taxable estate 13        exceeds $21,000,000, 22%. 14        (2) in the case of the Illinois generation-skipping 15    transfer tax: 16            (A) if the amount by which the taxable transfer 17        exceeds the exemption amount is $6,000,000 or less, 18        5%; 19            (B) if the amount by which the taxable transfer 20        exceeds the exemption amount exceeds $6,000,000 but 21        does not exceed $16,000,000, 10%; 22            (C) if the amount by which the taxable transfer 23        exceeds the exemption amount exceeds $16,000,000 but 24        does not exceed $21,000,000, 16%; and 25            (D) if the amount by which the taxable transfer 26        exceeds the exemption amount exceeds $21,000,000, 22%.   HB2368- 3 -LRB104 03009 HLH 13027 b1    "Illinois estate tax" means the tax due to this State with 2respect to a taxable transfer.3    "Illinois generation-skipping transfer tax" means the tax 4due to this State with respect to a taxable transfer that gives 5rise to a federal generation-skipping transfer tax.6    "Illinois taxable estate" means the decedent's federal 7gross estate, as provided under Section 2031 of the Internal 8Revenue Code, without regard to whether the estate is subject 9to the federal estate tax, modified as follows: 10        (1) the decedent's federal gross estate shall be 11    increased by: 12            (A) the value of any property in which the 13        decedent had a qualifying income interest for life and 14        for which an election was made under subsection (b-1) 15        of this Section for Illinois estate tax purposes but 16        was not made for federal estate tax purposes; and 17            (B) the aggregate amount of taxable gifts, as 18        defined in section 2503 of the Internal Revenue Code, 19        made by the decedent within 3 years of the date of 20        death; and 21        (2) the decedent's federal gross estate shall be 22    decreased by: 23            (A) the exemption amount; 24            (B) the deductions found in sections 2053, 2054, 25        2055, 2056, and 2056A of the Internal Revenue Code; 26        and   HB2368- 4 -LRB104 03009 HLH 13027 b1            (C) the marital deduction for qualified terminable 2        interest property available for elections made 3        pursuant to subsection (b-1) of this Section. 4    For the purposes of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of 5this definition, the amount of the addition equals the value 6of the gift under section 2512 of the Internal Revenue Code and 7excludes any value of the gift included in the federal taxable 8estate or the value of any gift with a non-Illinois situs. The 9tax situs of a gift of real or tangible personal property shall 10be the location of the real or tangible personal property at 11the time the gift was given. The tax situs of intangible 12personal property shall be the state in which the decedent 13resided at the time the gift was given. 14    "Illinois transfer tax" means the Illinois estate tax or 15the Illinois generation-skipping transfer tax.16    "Internal Revenue Code" means, unless otherwise provided, 17the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to 18time.19    "Non-resident trust" means a trust that is not a resident 20of this State for purposes of the Illinois Income Tax Act, as 21amended from time to time.22    "Person" means and includes any individual, trust, estate, 23partnership, association, company or corporation.24    "Qualified heir" means a qualified heir as defined in 25Section 2032A(e)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.26    "Resident trust" means a trust that is a resident of this   HB2368- 5 -LRB104 03009 HLH 13027 b1State for purposes of the Illinois Income Tax Act, as amended 2from time to time.3    "State" means any state, territory or possession of the 4United States and the District of Columbia.5    "State tax credit" means:6    (a) For persons dying on or after January 1, 2003 and 7through December 31, 2005, an amount equal to the full credit 8calculable under Section 2011 or Section 2604 of the Internal 9Revenue Code as the credit would have been computed and 10allowed under the Internal Revenue Code as in effect on 11December 31, 2001, without the reduction in the State Death 12Tax Credit as provided in Section 2011(b)(2) or the 13termination of the State Death Tax Credit as provided in 14Section 2011(f) as enacted by the Economic Growth and Tax 15Relief Reconciliation Act of 2001, but recognizing the 16increased applicable exclusion amount through December 31, 172005.18    (b) For persons dying after December 31, 2005 and on or 19before December 31, 2009, and for persons dying after December 2031, 2010, an amount equal to the full credit calculable under 21Section 2011 or 2604 of the Internal Revenue Code as the credit 22would have been computed and allowed under the Internal 23Revenue Code as in effect on December 31, 2001, without the 24reduction in the State Death Tax Credit as provided in Section 252011(b)(2) or the termination of the State Death Tax Credit as 26provided in Section 2011(f) as enacted by the Economic Growth   HB2368- 6 -LRB104 03009 HLH 13027 b1and Tax Relief Reconciliation Act of 2001, but recognizing the 2exclusion amount of only (i) $2,000,000 for persons dying 3prior to January 1, 2012, (ii) $3,500,000 for persons dying on 4or after January 1, 2012 and prior to January 1, 2013, and 5(iii) $4,000,000 for persons dying on or after January 1, 62013, and with reduction to the adjusted taxable estate for 7any qualified terminable interest property election as defined 8in subsection (b-1) of this Section.9    (b-1) The person required to file the Illinois return may 10elect on a timely filed Illinois return a marital deduction 11for qualified terminable interest property under Section 122056(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code for purposes of the 13Illinois estate tax that is separate and independent of any 14qualified terminable interest property election for federal 15estate tax purposes. For purposes of the Illinois estate tax, 16the inclusion of property in the gross estate of a surviving 17spouse is the same as under Section 2044 of the Internal 18Revenue Code. 19    In the case of any trust for which a State or federal 20qualified terminable interest property election is made, the 21trustee may not retain non-income producing assets for more 22than a reasonable amount of time without the consent of the 23surviving spouse. 24    "Taxable transfer" means an event that gives rise to a 25state tax credit, including any credit as a result of the 26imposition of an additional tax under Section 2032A(c) of the   HB2368- 7 -LRB104 03009 HLH 13027 b1Internal Revenue Code.2    "Transferee" means a transferee within the meaning of 3Section 2603(a)(1) and Section 6901(h) of the Internal Revenue 4Code.5    "Transferred property" means: 6        (1) With respect to a taxable transfer occurring at 7    the death of an individual, the deceased individual's 8    gross estate as defined in Section 2031 of the Internal 9    Revenue Code. 10        (2) With respect to a taxable transfer occurring as a 11    result of a taxable termination as defined in Section 12    2612(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, the taxable amount 13    determined under Section 2622(a) of the Internal Revenue 14    Code. 15        (3) With respect to a taxable transfer occurring as a 16    result of a taxable distribution as defined in Section 17    2612(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, the taxable amount 18    determined under Section 2621(a) of the Internal Revenue 19    Code. 20        (4) With respect to an event which causes the 21    imposition of an additional estate tax under Section 22    2032A(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, the qualified real 23    property that was disposed of or which ceased to be used 24    for the qualified use, within the meaning of Section 25    2032A(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.26    "Trust" includes a trust as defined in Section 2652(b)(1)   HB2368- 8 -LRB104 03009 HLH 13027 b1of the Internal Revenue Code.2(Source: P.A. 96-789, eff. 9-8-09; 96-1496, eff. 1-13-11; 397-636, eff. 6-1-12.) 4    (35 ILCS 405/3)  (from Ch. 120, par. 405A-3)5    Sec. 3. Illinois estate tax. 6    (a) Imposition of Tax. An Illinois estate tax is imposed 7on every taxable transfer involving transferred property 8having a tax situs within the State of Illinois.9    (b) Amount of tax. On estates of persons dying before 10January 1, 2003, the amount of the Illinois estate tax shall be 11the state tax credit, as defined in Section 2 of this Act, with 12respect to the taxable transfer reduced by the lesser of: 13        (1) the amount of the state tax credit paid to any 14    other state or states; and 15        (2) the amount determined by multiplying the maximum 16    state tax credit allowable with respect to the taxable 17    transfer by the percentage which the gross value of the 18    transferred property not having a tax situs in Illinois 19    bears to the gross value of the total transferred 20    property.21    (c) On estates of persons dying on or after January 1, 2003 22and before January 1, 2026, the amount of the Illinois estate 23tax shall be the state tax credit, as defined in Section 2 of 24this Act, reduced by the amount determined by multiplying the 25state tax credit with respect to the taxable transfer by the   HB2368- 9 -LRB104 03009 HLH 13027 b1percentage which the gross value of the transferred property 2not having a tax situs in Illinois bears to the gross value of 3the total transferred property. 4    (d) For estates of persons dying on or after January 1, 52026, the amount of the Illinois estate tax shall be the amount 6of the Illinois taxable estate, multiplied by the Illinois 7estate tax rate. No tax shall be due under this Act if the 8decedent's Illinois taxable estate is not greater than zero. 9(Source: P.A. 93-30, eff. 6-20-03; 94-419, eff. 8-2-05.) 10    (35 ILCS 405/4)  (from Ch. 120, par. 405A-4)11    Sec. 4. Illinois generation-skipping transfer tax. 12    (a) Imposition of tax. An Illinois generation-skipping 13transfer tax is imposed on every taxable transfer resulting in 14federal generation-skipping transfer tax involving transferred 15property having a tax situs within the State of Illinois.16    (b) Amount of tax. For taxable transfers occurring before 17January 1, 2026, the The amount of the Illinois 18generation-skipping transfer tax shall be the maximum state 19tax credit allowable with respect to the taxable transfer, 20reduced by the lesser of: 21        (1) the amount of the state tax credit paid to any 22    other state or states; and 23        (2) the amount determined by multiplying the maximum 24    state tax credit allowable with respect to the taxable 25    transfer by the percentage which the gross value of the   HB2368- 10 -LRB104 03009 HLH 13027 b1    transferred property not having a tax situs in Illinois 2    bears to the gross value of the total transferred 3    property.4    (c) For taxable transfers occurring on or after January 1, 52026, the amount by which the taxable transfer exceeds the 6exemption amount, multiplied by the Illinois estate tax rate. 7(Source: P.A. 86-737.) 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.